Vermont, session 2025-2026, S303.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The three-acre stormwater discharge permit established under 2015
Acts and Resolves No. 64 has relied primarily on geographic information
system data without on-site verification, resulting in inaccuracies and required
permitting for properties that do not meet the statutory permit threshold.
(2) Requiring compliance from all properties subject to the three-acre
stormwater discharge permit, regardless of actual water quality impact,
imposes undue financial costs on property owners and creates inefficiencies in
the use of State resources. Vermonters are already subject to considerable
VT LEG #385131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.303
2026 Page 3 of 13
expenses and tax burdens. The State should not impose additional, substantial
costs on property owners that do not significantly contribute to the State’s
water quality impairments.
(3) Public roads maintained by municipalities or the State should not be
calculated as impervious surface for private properties when determining if a
property is subject to the three-acre stormwater discharge permit.
(4) The designation of a property under the three-acre stormwater
discharge permit has been treated in practice as a cloud on title, complicating
or impeding property sales and property financing, even though designation of
a parcel as subject to the permit was never intended to serve as a lien or legal
encumbrance.
(5) Vermont’s stormwater management resources must be prioritized
toward the properties that pose the greatest risk to water quality, while
preserving flexibility and fairness in implementation of stormwater discharge
permitting.
(6) Public outreach and education are necessary to restore public trust in
stormwater permitting and to ensure that property owners understand both the
history of the three-acre stormwater discharge permit and the amendments to
the permit required under this act.
VT LEG #385131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.303
2026 Page 4 of 13
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1264 is amended to read:
§ 1264. STORMWATER MANAGEMENT
* * *
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
* * *
(6) “Impervious surface” means those manmade surfaces, including
paved and unpaved roads, parking areas, roofs, driveways, and walkways, from
which precipitation runs off rather than infiltrates.
* * *
(10) “Regulated stormwater runoff” means precipitation, snowmelt, and
the material dissolved or suspended in precipitation and snowmelt that runs off
impervious surfaces and discharges into surface waters or into groundwater via
infiltration.
* * *
(14) “Stormwater runoff” means precipitation and snowmelt that does
not infiltrate into the soil, including material dissolved or suspended in it, but
does not include discharges from undisturbed natural terrain or wastes from
combined sewer overflows.
(15) “Stormwater system” includes the storm sewers; outfall sewers;
surface drains; manmade wetlands; channels; ditches; wet and dry bottom
basins; rain gardens; and other control equipment necessary and appurtenant to
VT LEG #385131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.303
2026 Page 5 of 13
the collection, transportation, conveyance, pumping, treatment, disposal, and
discharge of regulated stormwater runoff.
* * *
(c) Prohibitions.
(1) A person shall not commence the construction or redevelopment of
one-half of an acre or more of impervious surface without first obtaining a
permit from the Secretary.
* * *
(7) In accordance with the schedule established under subdivision (g)(3)
of this section, a person shall not discharge stormwater from impervious
surface of three or more acres in size without first obtaining an individual
permit or coverage under a general permit issued under this section if the
discharge was never previously permitted or was permitted under an individual
permit or general permit that did not incorporate the requirements of the 2002
Stormwater Management Manual or any subsequently adopted Stormwater
Management Manual. The Secretary shall provide notice to all owners of
property subject to the permit required under this subdivision A person that
owns a parcel on which three or more acres of impervious surface is located
shall be required to obtain a permit under this section for the discharge of
stormwater from the impervious surface if the discharge was never previously
permitted or was permitted under an individual permit or general permit that
VT LEG #385131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.303
2026 Page 6 of 13
did not incorporate the requirements of the 2002 Stormwater Management
Manual or any subsequently adopted Stormwater Management Manual,
provided that:
(A) ANR initially shall only require a permit for those parcels that
the Secretary ranked under subdivision (g)(3)(C) of this section as within the
top 10 percent of parcels impacting water quality in the State; and
(B) all other parcels shall be subject to permitting according to the
schedule adopted by the Secretary under subdivision (g)(3)(D) of this section.
(d) Exemptions.
* * *
(e) State designation. The Secretary shall require a permit under this
section for a discharge or stormwater runoff from any size of impervious
surfaces upon a determination by the Secretary that the treatment of the
discharge or stormwater runoff is necessary to reduce the adverse impacts to
water quality of the discharge or stormwater runoff taking into consideration
any of the following factors: the size of the impervious surface, drainage
patterns, hydraulic connectivity, existing stormwater treatment, stormwater
controls necessary to implement the wasteload allocation of a TMDL, or other
factors. The Secretary may make this determination on a case-by-case basis or
according to classes of activities, classes of runoff, or classes of discharge.
The Secretary may make a determination under this subsection based on
VT LEG #385131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.303
2026 Page 7 of 13
activities, runoff, discharges, or other information identified during the basin
planning process.
(f) Rulemaking. On or before December 31, 2017, the The Secretary shall
adopt rules to manage stormwater runoff. At a minimum, the rules shall:
* * *
(13) Establish the general permit required under subdivision (g)(3) of
this section for discharges of stormwater from impervious surface of three or
more acres in size provided that the requirements of the rule and the general
permit are predictable, accessible to ordinary Vermonters, and cost
proportionate and cost reasonable relative to the impact of the parcel subject to
the permit.
(g) General permits.
(1) The Secretary may issue general permits for classes of stormwater
runoff that shall be adopted and administered in accordance with the provisions
of subsection 1263(b) of this title.
* * *
(3) Within 120 days after the adoption by the Secretary of the rules
required under subsection (f) of this section, the The Secretary shall issue a
general permit under this section for discharges of stormwater from impervious
surface of three or more acres in size, when the stormwater discharge
previously was not permitted or was permitted under an individual permit or
VT LEG #385131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.303
2026 Page 8 of 13
general permit that did not incorporate the requirements of the 2002
Stormwater Management Manual or any subsequently adopted Stormwater
Management Manual that require a permit under subdivision (c)(7) of this
section. Under the general permit, the Secretary shall:
(A) Exclude from the calculation of impervious surface on private
property impervious surface on any municipal or State road or highway located
adjacent to or within the residential or commercial development where the
private property is located.
(B) Conduct site visits of every parcel of property identified by
geographic information system (GIS) data as subject to the three-acre
stormwater discharge permit in order to confirm that impervious surface
subject to permitting under the permit is actually present on the parcel.
(C) Once the Secretary has confirmed that every parcel identified by
GIS data is subject to the three-acre stormwater discharge permit, rank all
parcels according to the severity of impact that the parcels have on water
quality. Severity of impact shall be determined by multiple factors, including
the parcel’s proximity to a water, slope, soil type, and drainage characteristics.
(D) Establish a schedule for implementation of the general permit by
geographic area of the State. The schedule shall establish the date by which an
owner of impervious surface shall apply for coverage under this subdivision
(3). The schedule established by the Secretary shall require an owner of
VT LEG #385131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.303
2026 Page 9 of 13
impervious surface subject to permitting under this subdivision to obtain
coverage by the following dates:
(i) for impervious surface located within the Lake Champlain
watershed, the Lake Memphremagog watershed, or the watershed of a
stormwater-impaired water on or before October 1, 2028; and
(ii) for impervious surface located within all other watersheds of
the State, not later than October 1, 2038, or not later than five years after a
binding stormwater-specific waste-load allocation has been established for that
watershed, whichever occurs first for discharges from parcels subject to the
permit required under subdivision (c)(7) of this section that are not within the
top 10 percent of parcels impacting water quality in the State. The schedule
shall be transparent and the required compliance date for the permitting of each
parcel shall be based on the actual severity of impact to water quality from a
discharge of stormwater from a parcel so that those parcels posing greater
impact are required to be permitted prior to those parcels of lower impact.
(B)(E) Establish practical, implementable, and cost-effective criteria
and technical standards, such as best management practices, for
implementation of stormwater improvements for the retrofitting of impervious
surface subject to permitting under this subdivision (3).
(C)(F) Require that a discharge of stormwater from impervious
surface subject to the requirements of this section comply with the standards of
VT LEG #385131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.303
2026 Page 10 of 13
subsection (h) of this section for redevelopment of or renewal of a permit for
existing impervious surface.
(D)(G) Allow the use of stormwater impact fees, offsets, and
phosphorus credit trading within the watershed of the water to which the
stormwater discharges or runs off.
(l) Enforcement safe harbor. The Secretary shall not initiate an
enforcement action under chapter 201 of this title against a person that failed to
obtain a permit under subdivision (c)(1) of this section for construction or
redevelopment of more than one-half of an acre but less than one acre of
impervious surface when:
(1) the construction occurred between July 1, 2022 and January 1, 2026;
(2) the owner of the property applied for and received a municipal
permit approving construction under authority set forth in 24 V.S.A. chapter
117; and
(3) the owner of the property was not notified by the municipality or the
Secretary that the threshold for a permit under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
had been lowered to one-half of an acre or more of impervious surface.
* * *
Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION AND TRANSITION
(a) Before filing under 3 V.S.A. § 841 a final proposal of the rule and
general permit required pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 1264(f)(13) for discharges of
VT LEG #385131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.303
2026 Page 11 of 13
stormwater from impervious surface of three or more acres, the Secretary of
Natural Resources shall submit to the House Committee on Environment and
the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy the proposed rule and
general permit for review. The submission shall include the list of properties
in the State subject to the permit under the proposed rule.
(b) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the requirements of the
Agency of Natural Resources’ General Permit 3-9050 Application
Requirements for Operational Stormwater Permits shall no longer be applied to
discharges of stormwater from impervious surface of three or more acres in
size if the discharge was never previously permitted or was permitted under an
individual permit or general permit that did not incorporate the requirements of
the 2002 Stormwater Management Manual or any subsequently adopted
Stormwater Management Manual. The required permitting of three-acre
parcels previously identified by the Agency of Natural Resources as requiring
a permit, including for parcels for which property owners have applied for but
have not received coverage under the general permit, shall pause until the
adoption by the Secretary of Natural Resources of the rule and general permit
required under 10 V.S.A. § 1264(f)(13).
(c) If a property owner of a parcel previously identified by the Agency of
Natural Resources as requiring a three-acre stormwater discharge permit
voluntarily elects to continue with stormwater management of the parcel, the
VT LEG #385131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.303
2026 Page 12 of 13
Secretary of Natural Resources shall issue any required permit as an individual
permit under 10 V.S.A. § 1264 and the rules adopted under that section.
(d) The Agency of Natural Resources shall permit parcels that are subject
to the permit requirement in 10 V.S.A. § 1264(c)(7) and that are in the top 10
percent of parcels impacting water quality as individual permits.
Sec. 4. 27 V.S.A. § 613 is added to read:
§ 613. THREE-ACRE SITE STORMWATER PERMIT
(a) Marketability of title. No encumbrance on record title to real estate or
effect on marketability shall be created by a property owner’s failure to obtain
or comply with the three-acre stormwater discharge permit issued by the
Secretary of Natural Resources pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 1264(c)(7).
(b) Disclosure of three-acre stormwater discharge permit.
(1) A property owner preparing to sell property subject to the three-acre
stormwater discharge permit issued under 10 V.S.A. § 1264(c)(7) shall, at least
72 hours prior to execution of the contract for the conveyance of the property,
disclose to the buyer that the property is subject to the three-acre stormwater
discharge permit.
(2) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall prepare a disclosure form
and informational material regarding the three-acre stormwater discharge
permit that a seller may provide to a buyer to satisfy the requirement of
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
VT LEG #385131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.303
2026 Page 13 of 13
(3) Noncompliance with the requirements of this subsection shall not
affect the marketability of title of a property.
Sec. 5. AGENCY OF NATURAL RESOURCES PUBLIC HEARINGS ON
THREE-ACRE STORMWATER DISCHARGE PERMIT
Within 120 days following the effective of this act, the Secretary of Natural
Resources shall conduct at least one public hearing in each county of the State
regarding the implementation and administration of the three-acre stormwater
discharge permit. At each public hearing, the Secretary shall:
(1) provide a plain-language overview of the history and purpose of the
three-acre stormwater discharge permit;
(2) explain the changes provided for in this act and the effect the
changes have on property owners; and
(3) allow time for public testimony, questions, and input.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385131 v.1